lt-LT: Purkštuko reguliavimas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Kita
pt-BR: Ajuste do bico: Ajustável; Fixo; Outro
sl-SI: Nastavljivost šobe: Prilagodljivo; Fiksna; Druga
zh-CN: 喷嘴可调节性: 可调节; 固定; 其他
fr: Réglage de la buse: Ajustables; Fixé; Autre
pl: Możliwość regulacji dyszy: Regulowane; Stałe; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť trysky: Nastaviteľná; Pevná; Iné
en: Nozzle adjustability: Adjustable; Fixed; Other
de: Düsenverstellbarkeit: Einstellbar; Befestigt; Sonstiges
es: Ajustabilidad de la boquilla: Ajustable; Fijo; Otros
fi: Suuttimen säädettävyys: Säädettävä; Pysyvä; Muu
ko: 노즐 조절 가능 여부: 조절식; 고정; 기타
pt-PT: Ajustabilidade do bocal: Ajustável; Fixo; Outro
el: Ρυθμιζόμενη λειτουργία ακροφυσίου: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Σταθερό; Άλλο
cs: Nastavitelnost trysky: Nastavitelné; Pevně nastavené; Jiné
sv: Munstyckets justerbarhet: Justerbar; Fast; Övrigt
it: Regolazione dell'ugello: Regolabile; Fisso; Altro
ja: ノズル調整機能: 調整可能; 固定; その他
tr: Meme ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Diğer
da: Dysejusterbarhed: Justerbar; Fast; Andet
th: ความสามารถในการปรับหัวฉีด: แบบปรับได้; แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; อื่นๆ
ru: Регулировка форсунки: Регулируемый; Фиксированный; Другое
nl: Sproeierverstelbaarheid: Verstelbaar; Vast; Overig
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh vòi phun: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Khác
hu: Fúvóka állíthatósága: Állítható; Rögzített; Egyéb
hr-HR: Podesivost mlaznice: Podesivo; Fiksno; Ostalo
ro-RO: Reglarea duzei: Reglabil; Fix; Altele
bg-BG: Регулируемост на дюзата: Регулируемо; Фиксирано; Друго
nb: Dysejusterbarhet: Regulerbar; Fast; Annet
zh-TW: 噴嘴可調性: 可調節式; 固定; 其他